Illinois, session 104th, SB3088.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 11-4.1 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/11-4.1)  (from Ch. 46, par. 11-4.1)7    Sec. 11-4.1. (a) In appointing polling places under this 8Article, the county board or board of election commissioners 9shall, insofar as they are convenient and available, use 10schools and other public buildings as polling places.11    (a-5) Before submitting a request to a school district for 12use of a school building as a polling place, the county board 13or board of election commissioners shall evaluate all other 14suitable alternatives before choosing a school as a polling 15place.16    (b) Upon request of the county board or board of election 17commissioners, the proper agency of government (including 18school districts and units of local government) shall make a 19public building under its control available for use as a 20polling place on an election day and for a reasonably 21necessary time before and after election day, without charge. 22If the county board or board of election commissioners chooses 23a school to be a polling place, then the school district must   SB3088- 2 -LRB104 20267 SPS 33718 b1make the school available for use as a polling place. However, 2for the day of the election, a school district is encouraged to 3(i) close the school or (ii) hold a teachers institute on that 4day with students not in attendance.5    (c) A government agency which makes a public building 6under its control available for use as a polling place shall 7(i) ensure the portion of the building to be used as the 8polling place is accessible to voters with disabilities and 9elderly voters and (ii) allow the election authority to 10administer the election as authorized under this Code.11    (d) If a qualified elector's precinct polling place is a 12school and the elector will be unable to enter that polling 13place without violating Section 11-9.3 of the Criminal Code of 142012 because the elector is a child sex offender as defined in 15Section 11-9.3 of the Criminal Code of 2012, that elector may 16vote by a vote by mail ballot in accordance with Article 19 of 17this Code or may vote early in accordance with Article 19A of 18this Code.19(Source: P.A. 98-773, eff. 7-18-14; 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15; 2099-143, eff. 7-27-15.)